Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-597
Retail or wholesale service; how construed.

(1) For purposes of sections 86-594 and 86-595, providing
a service on a retail or wholesale basis shall not include an agency or political
subdivision of the state, whether or not a public power supplier,
deploying or utilizing broadband services, Internet services, telecommunications
services, or video services, for its own use either individually or jointly
through the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Joint Public Agency Act, or the
Municipal Cooperative Financing Act for the internal use and purpose of the
agency, political subdivision, or public power supplier or to carry out the
public purposes of the agency, political subdivision, or public power supplier.

(2) Nothing in sections 86-593 to 86-598 prohibits or restricts the
ability of an agency, political subdivision, or public power supplier from
deploying or utilizing broadband services, Internet services, telecommunications
services, or video services for the internal use and purpose of the agency,
political subdivision, or public power supplier, or to carry out the public
purposes of the agency, political subdivision, or public power supplier.

Laws 2005, LB 645, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB658, § 1.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.